Alaska, session 34, HB13.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 09 * Section 1. AS 29.45.050(r) is amended to read: 10 (r) A municipality may by ordinance exempt or partially exempt from 11 taxation [AN AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED $10,000 OF THE ASSESSED VALUE 12 OF] real property owned and occupied as a permanent place of abode by a resident 13 who provides in the municipality volunteer (1) fire fighting services and is certified as 01 a firefighter by the Department of Public Safety; [, OR] (2) emergency medical 02 services or mobile intensive care paramedic services and is certified or licensed under 03 AS 18.08.082; or (3) hazardous materials response services. If two or more 04 individuals are eligible for an exemption for the same property, not more than two 05 exemptions may be granted. 06 * Sec. 2. AS 29.45.050 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 07 (aa) A municipality may by ordinance exempt or partially exempt from 08 taxation a structure that contains a dwelling unit that was converted from use as a 09 short-term rental unit to exclusive use as a long-term rental unit. In this subsection, 10 (1) "dwelling unit" has the meaning given in AS 34.03.360; 11 (2) "long-term rental unit" means a dwelling unit offered for rent for 12 periods of not less than 31 consecutive days; 13 (3) "short-term rental unit" means a dwelling unit offered for rent for 14 periods of 30 consecutive days or less; "short-term rental unit" does not include a 15 (A) hotel, motel, or bed and breakfast; 16 (B) commercially operated hunting or wilderness camp; or 17 (C) dwelling unit operated by a government entity or charitable 18 organization that provides temporary housing to individuals or family members 19 of individuals who are being treated for trauma, injury, or disease. 20 (bb) A municipality may by ordinance exempt or partially exempt from 21 taxation a mobile home park for up to 10 years after the mobile home park is 22 constructed or renovated. 23 (cc) A municipality may by ordinance exempt or partially exempt from 24 taxation real property rented to a low-income family if the monthly rent charged to the 25 low-income family is not more than 30 percent of the family's income. In this 26 subsection, 27 (1) "family income" means the sum of the previous tax year's adjusted 28 gross incomes for each person in the family who earned income divided by 12; 29 (2) "low-income family" has the meaning given to "low-income 30 families" in 42 U.S.C. 1437a(b)(2)(A). 31 (dd) A municipality may by ordinance exempt or partially exempt from 01 taxation real property owned and occupied as a permanent place of abode by a resident 02 of the municipality. 03 (ee) A municipality may by ordinance exempt or partially exempt from 04 taxation residential real property owned and occupied by a first-time home buyer. 05 * Sec. 3. AS 29.45.500(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) If a taxpayer pays taxes under protest, the taxpayer may bring suit in the 07 superior court against the municipality for recovery of the taxes. If judgment for 08 recovery is given against the municipality, or, if in the absence of suit, it becomes 09 obvious to the governing body that judgment for recovery of the taxes would be 10 obtained if legal proceedings were brought, the municipality shall refund the amount 11 of the taxes to the taxpayer with interest [AT EIGHT PERCENT] from the date of 12 payment plus costs. The interest rate is three percentage points above the 12th 13 Federal Reserve District discount rate in effect on January 2 of the year of 14 payment. 15 * Sec. 4. AS 29.45.500(b) is amended to read: 16 (b) If, in payment of taxes legally imposed, a remittance by a taxpayer through 17 error or otherwise exceeds the amount due, and the municipality, on audit of the 18 account in question, is satisfied that this is the case, the municipality shall refund the 19 excess to the taxpayer [WITH INTEREST AT EIGHT PERCENT FROM THE DATE 20 OF PAYMENT]. A claim for refund filed one year after the due date of the tax is 21 forever barred. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.